North Carolina statutes. Chapter 39. Conveyances.
Article 9. Disclosure.

§ 39-50.
Death, illness, or conviction of certain crimes not a material fact.

In offering real property for sale it shall not be deemed a material fact that the real property was occupied previously by a person who died or had a serious illness while occupying the property or that a person convicted of any crime for which registration
is required by Article 27A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes occupies, occupied, or resides near the property; provided, however, that no seller may knowingly make a false statement regarding any such fact.

History.
1989, c. 592, s. 1; 1998-212, s. 17.16A(a).

§§ 39-51 through 39-59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.